Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-238
Authority; members; liability.

Members of the authority shall not be liable to the state, the authority, or any other person as a result of their activities, whether ministerial or discretionary, as authority members, except for willful dishonesty or intentional violations of law. Members of the authority and any person executing bonds or policies of insurance shall not be liable personally thereon or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof. The authority may purchase liability insurance for members, officers, and employees and may indemnify any authority member to the same extent that a school district may indemnify a school board member pursuant to section 79-516.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 38;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 39;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1054.